North Carolina statutes. Chapter 119. Gasoline and Oil Inspection and Regulation.
Article 3. Gasoline and Oil Inspection.
§ 119-34.
Responsibility of retailers for quality of products.

The retail dealer shall be held responsible for the quality of the petroleum products he sells or offers for sale: Provided, however, that the retail dealer shall be released if the results of analysis of a sealed sample taken in a manner prescribed by the Commissioner of Agriculture at the time of delivery, and in the presence of the distributor or his agent, show that the product delivered by the distributor was of inferior quality. It shall be the duty of the distributor or his agent to assist in sampling the product delivered.

History.

1937, c. 425, s. 18; 1949, c. 1167.

§ 119-35.
Adulteration of products offered for sale.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation who has purchased gasoline or other liquid motor fuel upon which a road tax has been paid to in anywise adulterate the same by the addition thereto of kerosene or any other liquid substance and sell or offer for sale the same. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1937, c. 425, s. 19; 1993, c. 539, s. 908; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 119-36.
Certified copies of official tests admissible in evidence.

A certified copy of the official test of the analysis of any petroleum product, under the seal of the Commissioner of Agriculture, shall be admissible as evidence of the fact therein stated in any of the courts of this State on the trial of any issue involving the qualities of said product.

History.

1937, c. 425, s. 20; 1949, c. 1167.

§ 119-37.
Retail dealers required to keep copies of invoices and delivery tickets.

Every person, firm, or corporation engaged in the retail business of dispensing gasoline and/or other petroleum products to the public shall keep on the premises of said place of business, for a period of one year, duplicate original copies of invoices or delivery tickets of each delivery received, showing the name and address of the party to whom delivery is made, the date of delivery, the kind and amount of each delivery received, and the name and address of the distributor. Each delivery ticket or invoice shall be signed by the retailer or his agent and the distributor or his agent. Such records shall be subject to inspection at any time by the gasoline and oil inspectors.

History.

1937, c. 425, s. 21.

§ 119-38.
Prosecution of offenders.

All prosecutions for fines and penalties under the provisions of this Article shall be by indictment in a court of competent jurisdiction in the county in which the violation occurred.

History.

1937, c. 425, s. 22.

§ 119-39.
Violation a misdemeanor.

Unless another penalty is provided in this Article, any person violating any of the provisions of this Article or any of the rules and regulations of the Secretary of Revenue or the Commissioner of Agriculture and/or the Gasoline and Oil Inspection Board shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1937, c. 425, s. 23; 1949, c. 1167; 1973, c. 476, s. 193; 1993, c. 539, s. 909; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 119-39.1.
Civil Penalties.

The Commissioner of Agriculture may assess a civil penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) against any person who violates a provision of this Article or any rule promulgated thereunder. In determining the amount of the penalty, the Commissioner shall consider the degree and extent of harm caused by the violation.

The clear proceeds of civil penalties assessed pursuant to this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

History.

1995, c. 516, s. 4; 1998-215, s. 24.

§§ 119-40,
119-41.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1995 (Regular Session, 1996), c. 647, s. 56.

§ 119-42.
Persons engaged in transporting required to have in possession an invoice, bill of sale or bill of lading.

Every person hauling, transporting or conveying into, out of, or between points in this State any motor fuel and/or any liquid petroleum product that is or may hereafter be made subject to the inspection laws of this State over either the public highways or waterways of this State, shall, during the entire time he is so engaged, have in his possession an invoice, or bill of sale, or bill of lading showing the true name and address of the person from whom he has received the motor fuel and/or other liquid petroleum products, the kind, and the number of gallons so originally received by him, and the true name and address of every person to whom he has made deliveries of said motor fuel and/or other liquid petroleum products or any part thereof and the number of gallons so delivered to each said person. Such person engaged in transporting said motor fuels and/or other petroleum products shall, at the request of any agent of the Commissioner of Agriculture, exhibit for inspection such papers or documents immediately, and if said person fails to produce said papers or documents or if, when produced, they fail to clearly disclose said information, the agent of the Commissioner of Agriculture shall hold for investigation the vehicle and contents thereof. If investigation shows that said motor fuels and/or other petroleum products are being transported in violation of or without compliance with the motor fuel tax and/or inspection laws of this State such fuels and/or other petroleum products and the vehicle used in the transportation thereof are hereby declared common nuisances and contraband, and shall be seized and sold and the proceeds shall go to the common school fund of the State: Provided, however, that this Article shall not be construed to include the carrying of motor fuel in the supply tank of vehicles which is regularly connected with the carburetor of the engine of the vehicle, except when said fuel supply tank shall have a capacity of more than 100 gallons: And, provided further, that this section shall not be construed to include the carrying of motor fuel in the supply tank which is regularly connected with the carburetor of the engine of any vehicle operated by franchise carriers engaged solely in the transportation of passengers to, from and between points in North Carolina.

History.

1937, c. 425, s. 25; 1939, c. 276, s. 3; 1949, c. 1167.

§ 119-43.
Display required on containers used in making deliveries.

Every person delivering at wholesale or retail any gasoline in this State shall deliver the same to the purchaser only in tanks, barrels, casks, cans, or other containers having the word “Gasoline” or the name of such other like products of petroleum, as the case may be, in English, plainly stenciled or labeled in colors to meet the requirements of the regulations adopted by the Commissioner of Agriculture and/or the Gasoline and Oil Inspection Board. Such dealers shall not deliver kerosene oil in any barrel, cask, can, or other container which has not been stenciled or labeled as hereinbefore provided. Every person purchasing gasoline for use or sale shall procure and keep the same only in tanks, barrels, casks, cans, or other containers stenciled or labeled as hereinbefore provided: Provided, that nothing in this section shall prohibit the delivery of gasoline by hose or pipe from a tank directly into the tank of any automobile or any other motor vehicle: Provided further, that in case gasoline or other inflammable liquid is sold in bottles, cans, or packages of not more than one gallon for cleaning and other similar purposes, the label shall also bear the words “Unsafe when exposed to heat or fire.”

History.

1937, c. 425, s. 26; 1939, c. 276, s. 4; 1949, c. 1167.

§ 119-44.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1995 (Regular Session, 1996), c. 647, s. 56.

§ 119-45.
Certain laws adopted as part of Article.

General Statutes 119-1 through 119-5 and

G.S. 119-7

through 119-13 are hereby made a part of this Article.

History.

1937, c. 425, s. 28.

§ 119-46.
Charges for analysis of samples.

The Secretary of Revenue is hereby authorized to fix and collect such charges as he may deem adequate and reasonable for any analysis made by the Gasoline and Oil Inspection Division of any sample submitted by any person, firm, association or corporation other than samples submitted by the gasoline and oil inspectors in the performance of the duties required of said inspectors under this Article: Provided, however, that no charge shall be made for the analysis of any sample submitted by any municipal, county, State or federal official when the results of such analyses are necessary for the performance of his official duties. All moneys collected for such analyses shall be paid into the State treasury to the credit of the Gasoline and Oil Inspection Fund.

History.

1937, c. 425, s. 29; 1973, c. 476, s. 193.

§ 119-47.
Inspection of fuels used by State.

The Gasoline and Oil Inspection Division is hereby authorized, upon request of the proper State authority, to inspect, analyze, and report the result of such analysis of all fuels purchased by the State of North Carolina for the use of all departments and institutions.

History.

1937, c. 153.